District of Columbia statutes.
3-1691

Repealed

Penalties; alternative sanctions.

Repealed.

Mar. 13, 1993, D.C. Law 9-184, § 501, 39 DCR 8208
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-261, § 1235, 46 DCR 3142
1981 Ed., § 2-291.
Revision of chapter: See note to § 3-1641.